Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 3. Leasing of Land Other Than for the Extraction of Natural Resources.

Cross references. —

For reservation to which contracts for sale, lease or grant of state land and deeds to state land, properties or interest to state land are subject, see AS

38.05.125

.

Administrative Code. —

For leasing of lands, see 11 AAC 58.

For grazing leases, see 11 AAC 60.

For shore fisheries leasing, see 11 AAC 64.

Sec. 38.05.070.
Generally.

Land, including tide, submerged, or shoreland, to which the state holds title or to which it may become entitled, may be leased, except for the extraction of natural resources, in the manner provided in AS

38.05.070

—

38.05.105

.

The director, with the approval of the commissioner, shall determine the land to be leased and the limitations, conditions, and terms of the lease. The director shall preserve reasonable and traditional access to state land and water. If the appraised value of the transaction is $10,000 a year or less, the director may negotiate a lease for a period not to exceed 10 years, and on the limitations, conditions, and terms that the director considers are in the best interests of the state. A lease negotiated under this subsection is not eligible for a preference under AS

38.05.102

.

A lease may be issued for a period up to 55 years, if the commissioner determines it to be in the best interests of the state. The commissioner shall consider the useful life of any improvements proposed and approved under AS

38.05.075

in determining the term of the lease. If the commissioner determines that the land or a part of it which is the subject of a grazing lease is not being used for the purpose issued, the lease may be declared void.

If, after notice under AS

38.05.945

soliciting interest for a competitive auction, the department determines that only one potential bidder has expressed interest in bidding, the director may cancel the competitive auction and negotiate a lease and its conditions and terms that the director determines to be in the best interests of the state.

The director may renew a lease issued under this section, AS

38.05.075

,

38.05.083

, or

38.05.810

upon its expiration if the lease is in good standing and the lease renewal is determined to be in the best interests of the state. A renewal issued under this subsection is not subject to AS

38.05.035(e)

. A lease under this section, AS

38.05.075

,

38.05.083

, or

38.05.810

may be renewed only once for a term not longer than the initial term of the lease. The director shall provide notice of the lease renewal decision.

A lease may be extended once for a period up to two years if the director determines the extension to be in the best interests of the state and the extension is necessary to prolong the lease while the department considers

a lessee preference application under AS

38.05.102

;

an application to renew the lease under (e) of this section; or

an application to issue a new lease on the same site that, because the new lease substantially changes the purpose or operation of an existing lease, requires a new finding and determination under AS

38.05.035(e)

before the purpose or operation of a lease is changed.

An extension issued under (f) of this section is not subject to AS

38.05.035(e)

. The director shall provide public notice of the decision to extend the lease.

History.

(§ 1 art V ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 21 ch 113 SLA 1981; am §§ 27, 28 ch 152 SLA 1984; am §§ 6, 7 ch 27 SLA 2012; am § 2 ch 57 SLA 2016; am § 81 ch 13 SLA 2019; am § 2 ch 10 SLA 2021)

Administrative Code. —

For use limitation by classification, see 11 AAC 58, art. 1.

For grazing leases, see 11 AAC 60.

For aquatic farmsite permits and leases, see 11 AAC 63.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective November 8, 2016, added (f) and (g).

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in the introductory language in (f), deleted the comma following “two years”.

The 2021 amendment, effective September 13, 2021, in (e), inserted “38.05.083,” following “AS

38.05.075

, ” in the first sentence, and inserted “under this section, AS

38.05.075

,

38.05.083

, or

38.05.810

” following “A lease” in the third sentence.

Sec. 38.05.073.
Recreational facilities development leasing.

To identify land suitable for recreational facilities development leasing, the commissioner shall make the identification through a regional land use plan or a site-specific land use plan adopted under AS

38.04.065

. The identification of land for leasing under this section shall be consistent with any existing regional recreational management plan. The commissioner may request proposals from potential lessees under this section if consistent with an adopted land use plan that expressly allows the specific type of development under consideration. Consistent with AS

38.04.065

, the development of a land use plan used to identify land suitable for recreational facilities development leasing must consider the supply of recreational opportunities and alternatives, economic and social factors, and fish, wildlife, and other resources affected by the specific type and location of recreational facilities development under consideration.

AS

38.05.070(a)

,

38.05.085(c)

,

38.05.090

, and

38.05.103

apply to leasing under this section. The other provisions of AS

38.05.070

—

38.05.105

do not apply to leasing under this section.

If the commissioner identifies land for recreational facilities development leasing under (a) of this section, at least 30 days before the commissioner decides to solicit proposals from potential lessees, the commissioner shall provide public notice of the location and the specific type of recreational facilities development being considered and request comments. The notice shall be provided to (1) a municipality if the land is entirely or partially within the boundaries of the municipality; (2) a regional corporation organized under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) if the boundaries of the corporation established by 43 U.S.C. 1606(a) encompass part or all of the land and the land encompassed by the corporation’s boundaries is entirely or partially outside the municipality; (3) a village corporation organized under 43 U.S.C. 1601 if all or part of the land is within 40 miles of the village for which the corporation was established and the land is located entirely or partially outside a municipality; (4) other persons affected by the specific recreational facility development; and (5) persons who have specifically requested to be notified. Public notice identifying the location and the specific type of recreational facilities development under consideration must also be published at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the state and in a local newspaper in general circulation in the region where the land is located. The comments received under this subsection become part of the public record for the consideration of the commissioner.

If the commissioner decides to solicit proposals, the commissioner shall prepare a written request for proposals that includes

the specific type of recreational facilities development for which the land may be leased;

the form of compensation that the commissioner intends to require for the lease under (1) of this subsection;

the selection criteria that the commissioner will use to determine the eligibility of a developer, including the developer’s financial backing and capability, experience in the proposed undertaking, ability to meet bonding or insurance requirements, and ability to comply with resource and environmental analysis requirements; and

the criteria that the commissioner will use to determine the suitability of proposals.

After preparing a request for proposals under (d) of this section, the commissioner may issue the request to solicit proposals from persons who are interested in leasing the land for recreational facilities development. The request for proposals must be advertised at least three times in a newspaper of general circulation in the state and in a local newspaper in general circulation in the region where the land is located. The proposals submitted to the commissioner must include the specific facts on which the potential lessee bases its ability to develop the land, including its ability to comply with the items identified in (d)(1) — (4) of this section.

After soliciting proposals under (e) of this section, if the commissioner determines that only one potential lessee is acceptable, the commissioner may begin negotiations with the potential lessee to develop the terms and conditions for the lease.

After soliciting proposals under (e) of this section, if the commissioner determines that two or more potential lessees are acceptable, the commissioner may select the potential lessee who submits the highest bid during a public auction or by sealed bids, whichever method the commissioner chooses. The minimum bid must equal the amount established by the commissioner plus the administrative fee established under (k) of this section. The commissioner shall also require the potential lessee to make an earnest money deposit under AS

38.05.860(b)

. After the commissioner selects a potential lessee, the commissioner may begin negotiations with the potential lessee to develop the terms and conditions for the lease.

After developing proposed lease terms and conditions with a potential lessee under (f), (g), or (j) of this section, the commissioner may issue a preliminary decision under AS

38.05.035(e)

that leasing the land to the potential lessee on the proposed terms and conditions serves the best interests of the state. During preparation of the preliminary decision, the commissioner shall consult with affected state agencies regarding issues within the agencies’ areas of responsibility and expertise. The commissioner shall give public notice of the preliminary decision under AS

38.05.945

and request comments from the public and state agencies. A public hearing shall be held in the region where the land proposed for lease is located if the commissioner determines there is sufficient local interest. The preliminary decision must include

a statement of the specific type of recreational facilities development for which the land will be leased;

an analysis of alternative sites;

a statement of the terms and conditions to be required in the proposed lease agreement;

a statement of the compensation that the state may require under the proposed lease agreement;

a statement of the potential economic, social, and environmental effects of the proposed development, including the effect on water quality and the traditional and recreational uses of the land;

a statement of the long-term commitments of fish, wildlife, and other natural resources that would be involved in the proposed development;

a statement of alternatives to the commitments identified under (6) of this subsection and alternatives or measures that may reduce or eliminate the effects identified under (5) of this subsection;

an identification of any studies, including economic feasibility studies, or plans to be required by the commissioner; and

for a large project, a preliminary assessment of the project’s economic feasibility based on available information.

After reviewing the comments received under (h) of this section, the commissioner shall make a final determination whether the proposed lease will serve the best interests of the state. If the commissioner determines that the proposed lease will serve the best interests of the state, the commissioner shall offer the lease to the proposed lessee subject to the terms, conditions, and study requirements the commissioner determines to be necessary. If a study or plan is required, the potential lessee may be required to provide and pay for the study or plan. For a large project where the commissioner has determined under (h) of this section that there may be significant economic, social, or environmental effects or long-term commitments of fish, wildlife, or other natural resources, the commissioner shall require the potential lessee to prepare and submit a comprehensive economic feasibility study to be completed no later than 18 months after the execution of the lease. State agencies with pertinent expertise or responsibilities shall be involved in the review of required plans and studies. If the plan or study involves fish, game, or customary and traditional use of natural resources, the Department of Fish and Game shall review the methodology and scope of the plan or study. If the Department of Fish and Game determines that the methodology and scope are appropriate for the plan or study, the methodology and scope may be used for the plan or study.

If a potential lessee who was selected under (g) of this section declines the lease offer made under (i) of this section, the commissioner may begin negotiations with the potential lessee who provided the next highest bid under (g) of this section to develop under (g) of this section the terms and conditions for a lease.

The commissioner shall require the potential lessee awarded the right to negotiate a lease under (f), (g), or (j) of this section to pay a nonrefundable administrative fee of at least $250.

The commissioner shall reject all proposals or bids for a lease when it is in the best interest of the state.

The compensation to be paid to the state for a lease issued under this section may include, in the discretion of the commissioner,

a percentage of the annual gross receipts as reported to the United States Internal Revenue Service;

a guaranteed annual minimum rent or a percentage of gross receipts, whichever is greater;

the fair market rental value;

a fixed annual rent that is not less than the fair market rental value of the land;

a fee for each user;

other compensation acceptable to the commissioner; or

a combination of the above.

The annual compensation paid to the state for a recreational facilities development lease shall be reevaluated and adjusted at five-year intervals. The annual compensation for each five-year period after the initial five years of the lease shall be calculated by the same method used to establish the compensation for the initial five-year period.

Before a lease is issued under this section, the land to be covered by the lease shall be surveyed. The survey must be adequate to describe the land to be covered by the lease.

Before entering into a lease under this section, the commissioner shall require the lessee to post a performance bond or provide other security acceptable to the commissioner to cover the costs to the department of one or more of the following, as determined by the commissioner:

completing the development, including site planning, under the terms and conditions of the lease;

maintaining the development under the terms and conditions of the lease;

restoring the lease site if the lease is abandoned or terminated.

The term of the lease may not exceed 55 years. At the expiration of the lease, the commissioner may offer the lessee a right of first refusal on a new lease under this section for the same land if the commissioner determines that leasing the land for an additional term serves the best interests of the state.

The lessee’s violation of a provision of this section or of a term or provision of a lease issued under this section subjects the lessee to appropriate legal action and penalties, including a forfeiture of the lease.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

In this section, “recreational facilities development” includes the development of lodges, resorts, and other tourism and recreation-related facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 183 SLA 1990; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 45 ch 56 SLA 2005; am § 8 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Sec. 38.05.075.
Leasing procedures.

Except as provided in AS

38.05.035

,

38.05.070

,

38.05.073

,

38.05.082

,

38.05.083

,

38.05.087

,

38.05.102

,

38.05.565

,

38.05.600

,

38.05.810

, and this section, when competitive interest has been demonstrated or the commissioner determines that it is in the state’s best interests, leasing shall be made at public auction or by sealed bid, at the discretion of the director, to the highest qualified bidder as determined by the commissioner. A bidder may be represented by an attorney or agent at a public auction. In the public notice of a lease to be offered at public auction or by sealed bid, the commissioner shall specify a minimum acceptable bid and the lease compensation method. The lease compensation method shall be designed to maximize the return on the lease to the state and shall be a form of compensation set out in AS

38.05.073(m)

. An aggrieved bidder may appeal to the commissioner within five days for a review of the determination. The leasing shall be conducted by the commissioner, and the successful bidder shall deposit at the public auction or with the sealed bid the first year’s rental or other lease compensation as specified by the commissioner, or that portion of it that the commissioner requires in accordance with the bid. The commissioner shall require, under AS

38.05.860

, qualified bidders to deposit a sum equal to any survey or appraisal costs reasonably incurred by another qualified bidder acting in accordance with the regulations of the commissioner or incurred by the department under AS

38.04.045

and AS

38.05.840

. If a bidder making a deposit of survey or appraisal costs is determined by the commissioner to be the highest qualified bidder under this subsection, the deposit shall be paid to the unsuccessful bidder who incurred those costs or to the department if the department incurred the costs. All costs for survey and appraisal shall be approved in advance in writing by the commissioner. The commissioner shall immediately issue a receipt containing a description of the land or interest leased, the price bid, and the terms of the lease to the successful qualified bidder. If the receipt is not accepted in writing by the bidder under this subsection, the commissioner may offer the land for lease again under this subsection. A lease, on a form approved by the attorney general, shall be signed by the successful bidder and by the commissioner.

When a valid existing federal grazing lease is cancelled to allow state selection of the area under lease, the lessee of the land has the preference right to lease the land without competitive bidding for a term equal to that originally granted in the cancelled federal lease and upon terms as favorable to the lessee as those contained in the cancelled federal lease.

The owner or lessee of land that fronts on shoreland, tideland, or submerged land of the state may be granted a preference right to a lease for the shoreland, tideland, or submerged land without competitive bidding if the director determines that

the lease of the shoreland, tideland, or submerged land is necessary to facilitate water transportation of goods, services, or resources to or from the owned or leased upland or for another water-dependent purpose;

the proposed use of the shoreland, tideland, or submerged land is compatible with the classification of the land and with any applicable land use plan adopted under AS

38.04.065

; and

issuance of the lease to the shoreland, tideland, or submerged land will not interfere with prior existing rights to the leased land.

If the commissioner issues a lease under (c) of this section, the right of access to the shoreland, tideland, or submerged land shall be nonexclusive in the lessee unless the commissioner grants the lessee the exclusive right to use the shoreland, tideland, or submerged land.

The commissioner may require prequalification of bidders for a lease to be issued under AS

38.05.070

. If the commissioner determines to require prequalification, the procedures established by this section and the notice including prequalification requirements required to be given under AS

38.05.945

shall be completed within 75 days of the receipt of the first lease application unless the commissioner grants additional time for the completion of the procedures. Within the 75-day period or the additional time granted by the commissioner, the commissioner shall complete

classification under AS

38.05.300

;

the procedures required by AS

38.05.035(e)

;

any other action required by law for the disposal of the lease to a bidder except survey, appraisal, and the auction or sealed bid.

If, after completion of the procedures required by (e) of this section, the commissioner determines that there is only one qualified bidder, the commissioner may issue a lease without competitive bidding at the approved, appraised market value of the land determined under AS

38.05.840

or by another form of lease compensation specified by the commissioner from among those set out in AS

38.05.073(m)

and designed to maximize the return on the lease to the state. The commissioner may establish terms and conditions for entry to the land pending survey and appraisal of the land. The commissioner shall issue the lease as soon as is practicable following the survey and appraisal of the land subject to the provisions of AS

38.05.035(e)

.

Notice of an auction or sealed bid required under this section shall be made by certified mail to all prequalified bidders.

A person aggrieved by a decision of the commissioner under this section may appeal to the commissioner within five days of the prequalification decision. The decision of the commissioner under this subsection may be appealed to the superior court.

History.

(§ 2 art V ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 10 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 74 SLA 1961; am § 2 ch 26 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 106 SLA 1966; am §§ 29, 30 ch 152 SLA 1984; am §§ 14, 15 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am § 5 ch 38 SLA 1994; am §§ 17 — 19 ch 91 SLA 1997; am §§ 9 — 10, 11 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Administrative Code. —

For use limitation by classification, see 11 AAC 58, art. 1.

For permits, see 11 AAC 58, art. 2.

For short title and definitions, see 11 AAC 58, art. 4.

For aquatic farmsite permits and leases, see 11 AAC 63.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

For sale or lease at auction, see 11 AAC 67, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The state may place reasonable conditions on the use and access to tideland by the littoral owner, but it cannot completely prevent access and use by those owners unless such access and use would be completely unreasonable. Access rights depend on many factors, including who seeks to use state resources, how access is desired, the purpose for which the access is needed, and any pre-exisiting third party ownership interests in the tidelands under consideration, and they will be determined on a case-by-case review based on the factual circumstances of each request for access. December 2, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.076.
Leases for pipeline purposes. [Repealed, § 31 ch 3 FSSLA 1973.]

Secs. 38.05.077 and 38.05.078.
Classification, disposal, and sale of remote parcels. [Repealed, § 7 ch 103 SLA 1983.
For current law see AS 38.09.]

Sec. 38.05.079.
Remote cabin permit. [Repealed, § 38 ch 91 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 38.05.080.
Rejection of bids.

Before the director signs the lease, the commissioner may reject all bids for leases when the best interest of the state justifies this action.

History.

(§ 2 art V ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 10 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 74 SLA 1961)

Sec. 38.05.082.
Leases for shore fisheries development; account.

The director, with the approval of the commissioner, may lease tide and submerged land for fisheries development. Fisheries development includes the utilization of shore gill nets or set nets for the taking of fish. Every lease issued under this section shall reserve to the public a right-of-way for access to navigable waters and other tide and submerged land.

The director may classify land as subject to leases for fisheries development and publicly invite applications for lease of the selected areas. Each application shall be accompanied by an affidavit to the effect that the applicant presently intends to personally utilize the leased area for fishing purposes the following season. If two or more applications are received for the same shore area, the director shall award the lease to the most qualified applicant. In determining the qualifications of applicants, the director shall consider the length of time during which the applicant has been engaged in set netting, the proximity of the past fishing sites of the applicant to the land to be leased, the present ability of the applicant to utilize the location to its maximum potential, and other factors relevant to the equitable assignment of the disputed area. If the director cannot determine a preference between conflicting applicants for the same lease site on the basis of qualifications, the director shall select between the applicants by lot. An aggrieved applicant may appeal to the commissioner within 30 days for a review of the director’s determination.

A lease for set net fishing may be issued for any period not exceeding 10 years. If the commissioner determines that the land is not being utilized for the purpose for which the lease is issued, the lease may be declared void. The director shall establish a reasonable rental for the lease, equal to the administrative costs involved in processing the leasehold applications.

Subleasing and renewals of leases are governed by AS

38.05.095

and

38.05.102

.

The lease of submerged land conveys no interest in the water above the land or in the fish in the water.

The shore fisheries development lease program account is established in the state treasury. The rents, fees, and other proceeds received by the department in connection with the issuance of shore fisheries development leases under this section shall be deposited into the account. The legislature may appropriate money deposited into the account for the operation of the shore fisheries development lease program by the department or for any other public purpose.

History.

(§ 2 ch 93 SLA 1963; am § 99 ch 6 SLA 1984; am §§ 2, 3 ch 27 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 63 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For state’s ability to issue lease for shore fisheries on certain land conveyed to municipalities, see AS

38.05.825(d)

.

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For shore fisheries leasing, see 11 AAC 64.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section, which authorizes shore fishery leases, does not create an exclusive right of fishery and therefore is not unconstitutional under § 15, art. VIII, of the state constitution. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 03.

This section can be amended to limit the issuance of state tidelands leases for fisheries development to residents of Alaska. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 03.

Sec. 38.05.083.
Aquatic farming and hatchery site leases.

The commissioner may offer to the public for lease at public auction or by sealed bid under AS

38.05.075

or by negotiation under AS

38.05.070

a site for aquatic farming or related hatchery operations. Before a final decision to issue a lease under this section, the commissioner shall give notice and allow opportunity for comment in accordance with AS

38.05.945

and may hold a hearing to take testimony. Before a final decision to issue a lease under this section, the commissioner shall consider all relevant comment or testimony submitted under this section, AS

38.05.945

, or

38.05.946

.

The commissioner, for good cause, may deny an application for issuance of a lease under this section but shall provide the applicant with written findings that explain the reasons for the denial.

A site may be leased under this section for not less than the appraised fair market value of the lease. The value of the lease shall be reappraised every five years.

A lease under this section may be assigned, but, if the assignee changes the use of the site, the lease reverts to the state.

Before entering into a lease under this section, the commissioner shall require the lessee to post a performance bond or provide other security to cover the costs to the department of restoring the leased site in the event the lessee abandons the site.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations establishing criteria for the approval or denial of leases under this section and for limiting the number of sites for which leases may be issued in an area in order to protect the environment and natural resources of the area. The regulations must provide for the consideration of upland management policies and whether the proposed use of a site is compatible with the traditional and existing uses of the area in which the site is located.

The commissioner may, under AS

38.05.070(e)

— (g), renew or extend a lease issued under this section.

Nothing in this section prohibits a lessee under this section using a site for aquatic farming and related hatchery operations from also using that site for a tourism enterprise or educational purpose relating to aquatic farming or related hatchery operations.

Notwithstanding AS

38.05.035

and

38.05.850

, if a site leased under this section is actively used for aquatic farming or related hatchery operations, the commissioner may not charge a lessee, sublessee, or other person assigned all or a part of the lease a fee for using or allowing the use of the site, or passage across the site, for a tourism enterprise or educational purpose relating to aquatic farming or related hatchery operations.

History.

(§ 13 ch 145 SLA 1988; am § 20 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 12 ch 27 SLA 2012; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 10 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For direction to the department to prepare and submit a report concerning aquatic farming and hatchery site lease applications and recommendations for streamlining and improving leasing arrangements, and prescribing the deadline for its submission, see § 6, ch. 10, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For aquatic farmsite permits and leases, see 11 AAC 63.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective September 13, 2021, in (a), deleted “or renew” following “issue” in the second and third sentences; in (b), deleted “or renewal” following “issuance”; added (g) – (i).

Sec. 38.05.085.
Term of lease.

[Repealed, § 37 ch 2 FSSLA 1992.]

[Repealed, § 37 ch 2 FSSLA 1992.]

The lessee shall make advance payments of the annual rent or other form of lease compensation specified by the commissioner or that portion of it the commissioner may require.

A preference right lessee of grazing or forest land may follow the payment schedule established in the cancelled federal lease or grazing permit if the lessee so desires.

Notice of all actions by the department affecting the rights of a lease or lessee shall be given to the lessee.

A violation of a provision of this chapter or of a term or provision of a lease subjects the lessee to appropriate legal action, including, but not limited to, a forfeiture of the lease.

[Repealed, § 37 ch 2 FSSLA 1992.]

History.

(§ 3 art V ch 169 SLA 1959; § 11 ch 61 SLA 1960; § 4 ch 74 SLA 1961; am § 9 ch 138 SLA 1977; am §§ 8, 9 ch 182 SLA 1978; am §§ 16, 37 ch 2 FSSLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For aquatic farmsite permits and leases, see 11 AAC 63.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The lease conversion provisions enacted by 1977 legislation (§§ 12, 13, ch. 138, SLA 1977, as amended by § 21, ch. 182, SLA 1978) applied only to those leases entered into under the substantive statutory provisions which were amended by the 1977 legislation.
Hence, substantive amendments to AS 38.05 could not be applied to a lease which was not authorized by the leasing provisions of AS 38.05, but rather by the leasing provisions of AS 38.35, and the state was not estopped from challenging the validity of the terms of a wrongfully converted lease. December 10, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.087.
Forest Service permittees’ leasing preference.

Before offering to the public any land for lease which is subject to a valid existing United States Forest Service permit in effect in a state-selected area on the day before the area was tentatively approved for patent to the state, the director shall offer the land for leasing to the permittee at not less than its fair appraised market value before offering it to the general public.

When not in conflict with this section, the provisions of AS

38.05.070

—

38.05.105

apply to leases under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 26 SLA 1963; am § 3 ch 26 SLA 1979)

Sec. 38.05.090.
Removal or reversion of improvements upon termination of leases.

Unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the commissioner, a lessee shall remove from a former leasehold

all personal property, including above-ground tanks, transportable buildings, equipment, machinery, tools, and other goods, not belonging to the state, within 30 days after termination of the lease; and

all buildings and fixtures, including gravel pads, and below-ground tanks, foundations, and slabs, not belonging to the state, within 60 days after termination of the lease.

Unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the commissioner, the lessee shall restore the leasehold to a good and marketable condition, acceptable to the commissioner, within 120 days after termination of the lease.

If the lessee does not remove personal property, buildings, and fixtures as required within the time specified under (a) of this section, title to the personal property, buildings, and fixtures that remain automatically vests in the state unless the commissioner elects to remove and dispose of the remaining personal property, buildings, and fixtures of the lessee. The commissioner may assess upon the lessee the cost of removing and disposing of personal property, buildings, and fixtures remaining upon the land.

If the lessee does not restore the land within the time period specified under (b) of this section, the commissioner may have the land restored and assess the costs upon the lessee.

As part of a lease agreement, and in order to protect the public interest, the commissioner may require terms for removal or reversion of improvements additional to those specified in (a) — (d) of this section.

Private residential improvements of a lessee that have become fixtures of the land and that are not removed by that lessee upon termination of the lease shall be purchased by the subsequent purchaser of the land if the improvements were authorized in the former lease or by permit from the director and if they have a net value of more than $10,000. The net value is the value of the improvements as determined by an appraisal approved by the commissioner, less all rents due the department, all costs of restoration under (d) of this section, and all department expenses estimated to be incurred in making the sale. After termination of the former lessee’s lease, and at additional times as determined necessary by the commissioner, the value of the authorized residential fixtures shall be determined by an independent appraisal made at the cost of the former lessee. A notice or offer by the state to sell formerly leased land under this subsection must state (1) the appraised value of authorized residential fixtures remaining on the land that must be purchased, and (2) that that cost is included in the purchase price. Out of the proceeds of the sale, the department shall pay to the former lessee the appraised value of the residential improvements, less all rents due the department, all costs of restoration due the department under (d) of this section, and all department expenses incurred in making the sale.

Personal property described in (c) of this section is not subject to AS 34.45 (Uniform Unclaimed Property Act).

History.

(§ 4 art V ch 169 SLA 1959; § 12 ch 61 SLA 1960; § 5 ch 74 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 140 SLA 1966; am § 21 ch 91 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For purchase by contract, see 11 AAC 54, art. 2.

For grazing leases, see 11 AAC 60.

For disposal of agricultural interest, see 11 AAC 67, art. 7.

For timber and logging requirements, see 11 AAC 71, art. 3.

Sec. 38.05.095.
Subleases.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a lessee may sublease or assign the leased land or a portion of it if, after application to the director, the director issues a permit. The director may issue a permit upon a finding that it is in the best interests of the state to do so.

A nonprofit organization that is exempted from paying rent on state land under AS

38.05.810

may not sublease or assign the land or a portion of it on which it has a lease.

History.

(§ 5 art V ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 10 ch 182 SLA 1978; am § 29 ch 113 SLA 1981)

Administrative Code. —

For aquatic farmsite permits and leases, see 11 AAC 63.

Sec. 38.05.096.
Exemption from rental payments on land leased for certain liquefied natural gas storage facilities.

A person leasing state land for a liquefied natural gas storage facility other than a gas storage facility subject to AS

38.05.180(u)

may request an exemption from lease payments as provided in this section. The exemption is applicable for the periods described in (b) of this section.

The exemption is available for the calendar year in which the liquefied natural gas storage facility commences commercial operation and for each of the nine calendar years immediately following the first year of commercial operation. However, an exemption is not applicable for the calendar year after the facility ceases commercial operation or for any subsequent calendar year.

The lessee shall provide the director with any information the director requests to determine whether the lessee qualifies for the exemption.

Information related to state land leased for a liquefied natural gas storage facility qualifying for the exemption in this section is public information and may be furnished to the Regulatory Commission of Alaska. On request, the director shall provide the name of each person using state land leased for a liquefied natural gas storage facility, the years for which an exemption was granted, and the amount of the exemption.

A person receiving an exemption for a payment under this section that contracts to store liquefied natural gas for a utility regulated under AS 42.05 shall reduce the storage price to reflect the value of the exemption.

In this section,

“ceases commercial operation” and “commences commercial operation” have the meanings given in AS

31.05.032

;

“liquefied natural gas storage facility” has the meaning given in AS

42.05.990

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 51 SLA 2012)